Maryland, session 2026, HB1337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1115.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LOT” MEANS A PARCEL OF LAND THAT WAS SUBDIVIDED AND
RECORDED IN THE COUNTY LAND RECORDS DURING THE PERIOD BETWEEN
JANUARY 1, 1976, AND DECEMBER 31, 2019, BOTH INCLUSIVE.
(3) “PLAN” MEANS A PLAN FOR WELL OR SEPTIC SERVICE FOR:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1337*

HOUSE BILL 1337
(I) A LOT; OR
(II) AN EXISTING OR PROPOSED STRUCTURE OR IMPROVEMENT
ON A LOT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN FREDERICK COUNTY.
(C) UNLESS THE LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT ISSUES A FORMAL WRITTEN
FINDING OF IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR WELFARE, THE
LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE OR OTHERWISE ACCEPT, WITHOUT
CHANGE OR COMMENT, A PLAN FOR WELL AND SEPTIC SERVICE IF THE PLAN IS
PREPARED AND CERTIFIED BY:
(1) A PROFESSIONAL ENGINEER THAT IS CERTIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN SAND MOUND CONSTRUCTION AND AT–GRADE CONSTRUCTION FOR
COMPLEX WELL AND SEPTIC SYSTEMS; OR
(2) A LICENSED ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST FOR
TRADITIONAL BELOW–GRADE WELL AND SEPTIC SYSTEMS.
(D) A FINDING OF IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE APPEALED TO THE LOCAL HEALTH
DEPARTMENT WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE FINDING WAS ISSUED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.